test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IS_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kíl is - ENGLISH : # CLASS_IS_STEM_3

     kíl is+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kíl ijáa
     kíl is+V+INDIRECT+PAST: kíl ijáan
     kíl is+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kíl ijáas
     kíl is+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kíl ijáa.ang
     kíl is+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: kíl ijáa'ahlang
     kíl is+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kíl ijáa'ahlanggaa
     kíl is+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kíl ijáa'ahlanggang
